apertium-spa-ast.spa.dix
  <pardef n="p/udrir__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriríamos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriría</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriríais</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrirías</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrirían</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriría</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriremos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriré</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriréis</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrirás</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrirán</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrirá</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriéremos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriere</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriereis</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrieres</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrieren</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriere</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriendo</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriéndo</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabiéndo"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrimos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrí</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udristeis</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriste</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrieron</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrió</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrid</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrid</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabed"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrí</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__suscribí"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udríd</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabéd"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udre</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>údre</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sábe"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrir</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrir</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__saber"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrír</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabér"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udríamos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udría</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udríais</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrías</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrían</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udría</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriéramos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>udriésemos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriera</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>udriese</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrierais</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>udrieseis</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrieras</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>udrieses</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrieran</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>udriesen</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udriera</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>udriese</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>odridas</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>odrida</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>odridos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>odrido</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>odrido</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrimos</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udro</l>
        <r>udrir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>udrís</l>

<e><i>p</i><par n="p/udrir__vblex"/></e>
